fr: Style de porte-encens: Récupérateur de cendres; Reflux; Bateau; Bol; Boîte; Brûle-encens; Brûleur à spirale; Plaque; Tour; Autre
vi: Kiểu giá cắm nhang/hương: Khay hứng tro; Dòng chảy ngược; Thuyền; Bát; Hộp; Lư hương; Đế đốt nhang vòng; Tấm lắp; Dạng tháp; Khác
ja: 線香立てのスタイル: 灰キャッチャー; バックフロー; ボート; ボウル; ボックス; 香炉; コイルバーナー; プレート; タワー; その他
zh-TW: 線香座風格: 集灰; 倒流; 船形; 碗形; 盒型; 香爐; 環香爐; 平板; 塔形; 其他
lt-LT: Smilkalų laikiklio tipas: Pelenų gaudyklė; Atbulinis srautas; Laivelis; Dubuo; Dėžutė; Smilkintojas; Spiralinis degiklis; Plokštelė; Bokštinis; Kita
sv: Rökelsehållarens stil: Askfångare; Återflöde; Båt; Skål; Låda; Rökelsekar; Brännare med spole; Tallrik; Torn; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบของที่วางธูป: แท่นรองรับเถ้าธูป; แบบควันไหลย้อน; เรือ; ทรงชาม; กล่อง; ภาชนะเผากำยาน; แท่นเผาธูปขด; แผ่น; ทาวเวอร์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 香熏座风格: 集灰盘; 回流式; 船形; 碗形; 盒形; 香炉; 盘香座; 碟形; 塔形; 其他
en: Incense holder style: Ash catcher; Backflow; Boat; Bowl; Box; Censer; Coil burner; Plate; Tower; Other
pt-PT: Estilo de suporte de incenso: Coletor de cinzas; Refluxo; Barco; Tigela; Caixa; Incensário; Queimador de bobina; Placa; Torre; Outro
fi: Suitsukepidikkeen tyyli: Tuhkankerääjä; Takaisinvirtaus; Vene; Kulho; Laatikko; Suitsukeastia; Käämipoltin; Levy; Torni; Muu
es: Estilo de porta incienso: Colector de cenizas; Reflujo; Barco; Tazón; Caja; Incensario; Quemador de bobina; Placa; Torre; Otros
it: Stile del bruciaincenso: Raccoglitore di cenere; Fiflusso; Barca; Bowl; Scatola; Incensiere; Bruciatore a serpentina; Piastra; Torre; Altro
da: Røgelsesholder: Askefanger; Tilbagestrømning; Båd; Skål; Boks; Røgelseskar; Spolebrænder; Tallerken; Tårn; Andet
pt-BR: Estilo do porta-incensos: Coletor de cinzas; Refluxo; Barco; Bowl; Caixa; Incensário; Queimador de espiral; Placa; Torre; Outro
pl: Typ kadzielnicy: Z łapaczem popiołu; Backflow (z przepływem wstecznym); Łódeczka; Miska; Pudełko; Kadzielnica; Palnik spiralny; Wieża; Wieża; Pozostałe
hu: Füstölőtartó stílusa: Hamufogó; Visszaáramlás; Hajó; Tálka; Doboz; Füstölő; Tekercségő; Lemez; Torony; Egyéb
sk-SK: Dizajn držiaka kadidla: S lapačom popola; S vodopádovým efektom; Čln; Misa; Škatuľa; Kadidelnica; Kadidlové špirály; Doska; Veža; Iné
nl: Stijl van wierookhouder: Asvanger; Terugstroming; Boot; Kom; Box; Wierookvat; Spiraalbrander; Bord; Toren; Overig
tr: Tütsülük tarzı: Kül haznesi; Geri akışlı; Kayık; Kase; Kutu; Buhurdanlık; Bobin brülörü; Tabak; Kule; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил на държач за тамян: Уловител на пепел; Обратен поток; Лодка; Купа; Кутия; Кадилник; Горелка с бобина; Плоча; Кула; Друго
ko: 향 받침대 스타일: 애쉬 캐처; 백플로우; 보트; 그릇; 상자; 센서; 코일 버너; 플레이트; 타워; 기타
el: Τύπος βάσης αρωματικών στικ: Συλλέκτης τέφρας; Αντίστροφη ροή; Βάρκα; Μπολ; Κουτί; Θυμιατήρι; Καυστήρας πηνίου; Πλάκα; Πύργος; Άλλο
nb: Røkelsesholderstil: Askefanger; Tilbakestrømning; Båt; Bolle; Eske; Røkelseskar; Spolebrenner; Tallerken; Tårn; Annet
ru: Тип подставки для благовоний: Сборник пепла; Обратный поток; Лодка; Чаша; Шкатулка; Кадильница; Спиральная горелка; Тарелка; Башня; Другая
hr-HR: Stil držača mirisnih štapića: Hvatač pepela; Povratni dim; Brod; Zdjela; Kutija; Kadionica; Spirala; Pločica; Toranj; Ostalo
ro-RO: Stilul suportului de tămâie: Colector de cenușă; Cădere inversă; Barcă; Bol; Cutie; Cădelniță; Arzător pentru spirală; Placă; Turn; Altele
sl-SI: Slog držala za kadilo: Lovilec pepela; Povratni tok; Čoln; Bazen; Škatla; Kadilnica; Tuljavni gorilnik; Plošča; Stolp; Druga
de: Stil des Räucherstäbchenhalters: Aschefänger; Rückfluss; Boot; Bowl; Kasten; Weihrauchfass; Spiralbrenner; Platte; Turm; Sonstiges
cs: Styl misky na kadidlo: Lapač popela; Stojánek na tekoucí dým (backflow); Lodička; Miska; Krabička; Kadidelnice; Stojánek na vonné spirály; Talířek; Věž; Jiné